Florida, session 2026, HB4075.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding s. 479.024, Florida
Statutes, a sign, as defined in s. 479.01, Florida Statutes,
shall be permitted on the following real property owned by the
Town of Davie and zoned for agricultural purposes, provided that
the sign complies with all other statutory requirements under
chapter 479, Florida Statutes:

Blackstone Creek, Plat Book 175, Page 82 Block
Portion of Tract A described as parcels 1, 2 & 3 in
Broward County Official Records Book 46669, Page
1626, less a Right of Way described in Official
Records Book 41139, Page 704, Less a portion
described in instrument number 114396648.

(2) This act is not intended to approve signs on any other
property within the Town of Davie.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4075 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4075 2026 Legislature
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4075 -01-er